Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 105.34 of Title 82, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Water Resources Board is hereby directed to
conduct a comprehensive study on the water flow of the Kiamichi
River. The study shall include, but shall not be limited to, the
following:
1. Assessment of the river's flow rates throughout the year
under varying conditions, including periods of drought and flood;
2. Evaluation of the minimum flow required to maintain the
river's ecological health and integrity;
Req. No. 10124 Page 1

3. Determination of the flow capacity necessary to allow for
permitting the removal of water from the river without causing
adverse impacts to the environment, existing water rights, and
downstream users; and
4. Analysis of the potential effects of constructing and
operating a low-water dam on the river, including:
a. hydrological impacts on water flow and sediment
transport,
b. ecological effects on fish, wildlife, and riparian
habitats, and
c. implications for recreational activities and local
communities.
B. The Board shall submit a final report detailing the findings
of the study and any recommendations for legislative or regulatory
actions to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma
State Senate, and the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives. The report shall be due no later than December 31,
2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10124 JBH 12/29/24



Req. No. 10124 Page 2